Louisiana, session 2026, HB337.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 4:710(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§710. Issuance of special licenses
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter to the contrary, the
office may provide by rule for the issuance of a special license for the conduct of no
more than two four bingo sessions annually at which the total amount of prizes
which may be awarded on any one calendar day under such a license shall not exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars in cash or other thing or things of value. Except as
otherwise provided in this Section, all other provisions of this Chapter shall apply
to the issuance of such special licenses.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 337 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.